Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2624
Insurance consultant; reexamination; when.

The director may require a consultant, after notice and hearing and a finding that the consultant lacks competency, to submit to reexamination if the director has reason to believe that the consultant lacks competence.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 19.